District of Columbia statutes.
47-3401.05

Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

(1)

The term “Authority” means the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority established under § 47-391.01(a);

(2)

The term “control period” has the meaning given such term under § 47-393(4) [§ 47-393(3)];

(3)

The term “District government” has the meaning given such term under § 47-393(5);

(4)

The term “financial plan and budget” has the meaning given such term under § 47-393(6); and

(5)

The term “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Treasury.

July 26, 1939, 53 Stat. 1118, ch. 367, title VI, § 605
as added Apr. 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 120, Pub. L. 104-8, § 204(c)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
renumbered as § 606, Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 765, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11402(1)
Budget and financial management, existing provisions and procedure and practice preserved, borrowing and spending limitations, see § 1-206.03.
1981 Ed., § 47-3401.5.